Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.315

Certain student information.

Information received by a school district superintendent, a designee of the superintendent, or a principal pursuant to RCW 28A.225.330, 9A.44.138, 13.04.155, 13.40.215, or 72.09.730 is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2020 c 167 s 10.]